Washington statutes.
RCW 19.158.010

Findings.

The use of telephones for commercial solicitation is rapidly increasing. This form of communication offers unique benefits, but entails special risks and poses potential for abuse. The legislature finds that the widespread practice of fraudulent commercial telephone solicitation is a matter vitally affecting the public interest for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW. For the general welfare of the public and in order to protect the integrity of the telemarketing industry, the commercial use of telephones must be regulated by law.

[ 1989 c 20 s 1.]